Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, HB2083.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Section 20-2325, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended to read: START_STATUTE20-2325. Diabetes; equipment; supplies A. Any health benefits plan that is offered by an accountable health plan and that provides coverage for diabetes shall also provide coverage for equipment and supplies that are medically necessary and that are prescribed by a health care provider, including: 1. Blood glucose monitors. 2. Blood glucose monitors for the legally blind. 3. Test strips for glucose monitors and visual reading and urine testing strips. 4. Insulin preparations and glucagon. 5. Insulin cartridges. 6. Drawing up devices and monitors for the visually impaired. 7. Injection aids. 8. Insulin cartridges for the legally blind. 9. Syringes, insulin pens and lancets, including automatic lancing devices. 10. Prescribed oral agents and self-injectable medications for controlling blood sugar glucose levels that are included on the plan formulary. 11. Adjunctive and nonadjunctive continuous glucose monitors and relevant equipment or supplies, including transmitters, sensors, readers, receivers and skin prep and dressing supplies. 12. Insulin pumps, including automated insulin delivery systems and continuous subcutaneous insulin infusion devices. 11. 13. To the extent coverage is required under medicare, podiatric appliances for prevention of complications associated with diabetes. 12. 14. Any other device, medication, equipment or supply for which coverage is required under medicare from and after January 1, 1999. The coverage required in this paragraph is effective six months after the coverage is required under medicare. B. Nothing in Subsection A of this section does not: 1. Entitles Entitle a member or enrollee of an accountable health plan to equipment or supplies for the treatment of diabetes that are not medically necessary as determined by the accountable health plan's medical director or the medical director's designee. 2. Provides Provide coverage for diabetic supplies obtained by a member or enrollee of an accountable health plan without a prescription unless otherwise permitted pursuant to the terms of the health benefits plan. 3. Prohibits Prohibit an accountable health plan from imposing deductibles, coinsurance or other cost sharing in relation to benefits for equipment or supplies for the treatment of diabetes. END_STATUTE